District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

5-105.08

Residence requirements for members of the Police and Fire Departments; waiver thereof; maintenance of telephone at residence.

Repealed.

History

July 25, 1956, 70 Stat. 646, ch. 726, § 1
Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 698, Pub. L. 88-517, § 1
June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 358, Pub. L. 91-297, title II, § 203
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 1201(a), 51 DCR 9406

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-129.
1973 Ed., § 4-132a.